lexd_components/hye-eanc_nouns_irreg.lexd
# from eanc noun lexeme list

LEXICON NounFamilyOchFixed
#Larger list in noun_lex_irreg
ընկեր:ընկեր
զուգընկեր:զուգընկեր
գործընկեր:գործընկեր
լուծընկեր:լուծընկեր
խաղընկեր:խաղընկեր
համընկեր:համընկեր
սեղանընկեր:սեղանընկեր
ճաշընկեր:ճաշընկեր
դասընկեր:դասընկեր
թասընկեր:թասընկեր
մասընկեր:մասընկեր
բախտընկեր:բախտընկեր
պարընկեր:պարընկեր
զրուցընկեր:զրուցընկեր

աներ:աներ

LEXICON NounFamilyOchBase
քույր:քույր
հորքուր:հորքուր{mono}

տեր:տեր

որբատեր:որբատեր{mono}
միլիարդատեր:միլիարդատեր{mono}
բերդատեր:բերդատեր{mono}
հասցեատեր:հասցեատեր{mono}
եզատեր:եզատեր{mono}
պարտիզատեր:պարտիզատեր{mono}
հորթատեր:հորթատեր{mono}
գաղութատեր:գաղութատեր{mono}
խանութատեր:խանութատեր{mono}
ձիատեր:ձիատեր{mono}
կապալատեր:կապալատեր{mono}
մեռելատեր:մեռելատեր{mono}
ուլատեր:ուլատեր{mono}
երեխատեր:երեխատեր{mono}
կալվածատեր:կալվածատեր{mono}
ստացվածատեր:ստացվածատեր{mono}
գործատեր:գործատեր{mono}
մուրհակատեր:մուրհակատեր{mono}
նամակատեր:նամակատեր{mono}
կտակատեր:կտակատեր{mono}
ագարակատեր:ագարակատեր{mono}
պանդոկատեր:պանդոկատեր{mono}
աղջկատեր:աղջկատեր{mono}
ձեռնարկատեր:ձեռնարկատեր{mono}
կինոձեռնարկատեր:կինոձեռնարկատեր{mono}
ստրկատեր:ստրկատեր{mono}
գանձատեր:գանձատեր{mono}
բաղատեր:բաղատեր{mono}
հողատեր:հողատեր{mono}
փողատեր:փողատեր{mono}
գյուղատեր:գյուղատեր{mono}
համատեր:համատեր{mono}
դրամատեր:դրամատեր{mono}
գոմատեր:գոմատեր{mono}
փայատեր:փայատեր{mono}
օթևանատեր:օթևանատեր{mono}
իջևանատեր:իջևանատեր{mono}
գութանատեր:գութանատեր{mono}
սեփականատեր:սեփականատեր{mono}
հողասեփականատեր:հողասեփականատեր{mono}
քարավանատեր:քարավանատեր{mono}
գերդաստանատեր:գերդաստանատեր{mono}
բոստանատեր:բոստանատեր{mono}
գործարանատեր:գործարանատեր{mono}
հանքագործարանատեր:հանքագործարանատեր{mono}
սրճարանատեր:սրճարանատեր{mono}
ճաշարանատեր:ճաշարանատեր{mono}
տպարանատեր:տպարանատեր{mono}
ցորենատեր:ցորենատեր{mono}
եզնատեր:եզնատեր{mono}
միլիոնատեր:միլիոնատեր{mono}
տոնատեր:տոնատեր{mono}
պաշտոնատեր:պաշտոնատեր{mono}
արտոնատեր:արտոնատեր{mono}
գառնատեր:գառնատեր{mono}
բեռնատեր:բեռնատեր{mono}
տնատեր:տնատեր{mono}
արնատեր:արնատեր{mono}
ցորնատեր:ցորնատեր{mono}
աղունատեր:աղունատեր{mono}
էշատեր:էշատեր{mono}
իշատեր:իշատեր{mono}
գոմշատեր:գոմշատեր{mono}
ընչատեր:ընչատեր{mono}
պահանջատեր:պահանջատեր{mono}
գավառատեր:գավառատեր{mono}
տնտեսատեր:տնտեսատեր{mono}
նավատեր:նավատեր{mono}
գրավատեր:գրավատեր{mono}
կովատեր:կովատեր{mono}
ավատատեր:ավատատեր{mono}
օգտատեր:օգտատեր{mono}
արտատեր:արտատեր{mono}
պարտատեր:պարտատեր{mono}
ճորտատեր:ճորտատեր{mono}
տավարատեր:տավարատեր{mono}
նավթահորատեր:նավթահորատեր{mono}
ջաղացատեր:ջաղացատեր{mono}
հայցատեր:հայցատեր{mono}
ամառանոցատեր:ամառանոցատեր{mono}
բանջարանոցատեր:բանջարանոցատեր{mono}
հյուրանոցատեր:հյուրանոցատեր{mono}
ընտանիքատեր:ընտանիքատեր{mono}
գույքատեր:գույքատեր{mono}
հանքատեր:հանքատեր{mono}
հարսանքատեր:հարսանքատեր{mono}
ապրանքատեր:ապրանքատեր{mono}
պարտքատեր:պարտքատեր{mono}
գրքատեր:գրքատեր{mono}
այգետեր:այգետեր{mono}
ընտանետեր:ընտանետեր{mono}
բաժնետեր:բաժնետեր{mono}
հասցետեր:հասցետեր{mono}
տանտեր:տանտեր{mono}
արենտեր:արենտեր{mono}
արյունտեր:արյունտեր{mono}
տանուտեր:տանուտեր{mono}
սիրուտեր:սիրուտեր{mono}

ողջումաքիր:ողջումաքիր

LEXICON NounFamilyOchReduced
հորքուր:հորքր{mono}

տեր:տիր
որբատեր:որբատիր{mono}
միլիարդատեր:միլիարդատիր{mono}
բերդատեր:բերդատիր{mono}
հասցեատեր:հասցեատիր{mono}
եզատեր:եզատիր{mono}
պարտիզատեր:պարտիզատիր{mono}
հորթատեր:հորթատիր{mono}
գաղութատեր:գաղութատիր{mono}
խանութատեր:խանութատիր{mono}
ձիատեր:ձիատիր{mono}
կապալատեր:կապալատիր{mono}
մեռելատեր:մեռելատիր{mono}
ուլատեր:ուլատիր{mono}
երեխատեր:երեխատիր{mono}
կալվածատեր:կալվածատիր{mono}
ստացվածատեր:ստացվածատիր{mono}
գործատեր:գործատիր{mono}
մուրհակատեր:մուրհակատիր{mono}
նամակատեր:նամակատիր{mono}
կտակատեր:կտակատիր{mono}
ագարակատեր:ագարակատիր{mono}
պանդոկատեր:պանդոկատիր{mono}
աղջկատեր:աղջկատիր{mono}
ձեռնարկատեր:ձեռնարկատիր{mono}
կինոձեռնարկատեր:կինոձեռնարկատիր{mono}
ստրկատեր:ստրկատիր{mono}
գանձատեր:գանձատիր{mono}
բաղատեր:բաղատիր{mono}
հողատեր:հողատիր{mono}
փողատեր:փողատիր{mono}
գյուղատեր:գյուղատիր{mono}
համատեր:համատիր{mono}
դրամատեր:դրամատիր{mono}
գոմատեր:գոմատիր{mono}
փայատեր:փայատիր{mono}
օթևանատեր:օթևանատիր{mono}
իջևանատեր:իջևանատիր{mono}
գութանատեր:գութանատիր{mono}
սեփականատեր:սեփականատիր{mono}
հողասեփականատեր:հողասեփականատիր{mono}
քարավանատեր:քարավանատիր{mono}
գերդաստանատեր:գերդաստանատիր{mono}
բոստանատեր:բոստանատիր{mono}
գործարանատեր:գործարանատիր{mono}
հանքագործարանատեր:հանքագործարանատիր{mono}
սրճարանատեր:սրճարանատիր{mono}
ճաշարանատեր:ճաշարանատիր{mono}
տպարանատեր:տպարանատիր{mono}
ցորենատեր:ցորենատիր{mono}
եզնատեր:եզնատիր{mono}
միլիոնատեր:միլիոնատիր{mono}
տոնատեր:տոնատիր{mono}
պաշտոնատեր:պաշտոնատիր{mono}
արտոնատեր:արտոնատիր{mono}
գառնատեր:գառնատիր{mono}
բեռնատեր:բեռնատիր{mono}
տնատեր:տնատիր{mono}
արնատեր:արնատիր{mono}
ցորնատեր:ցորնատիր{mono}
աղունատեր:աղունատիր{mono}
էշատեր:էշատիր{mono}
իշատեր:իշատիր{mono}
գոմշատեր:գոմշատիր{mono}
ընչատեր:ընչատիր{mono}
պահանջատեր:պահանջատիր{mono}
գավառատեր:գավառատիր{mono}
տնտեսատեր:տնտեսատիր{mono}
նավատեր:նավատիր{mono}
գրավատեր:գրավատիր{mono}
կովատեր:կովատիր{mono}
ավատատեր:ավատատիր{mono}
օգտատեր:օգտատիր{mono}
արտատեր:արտատիր{mono}
պարտատեր:պարտատիր{mono}
ճորտատեր:ճորտատիր{mono}
տավարատեր:տավարատիր{mono}
նավթահորատեր:նավթահորատիր{mono}
ջաղացատեր:ջաղացատիր{mono}
հայցատեր:հայցատիր{mono}
ամառանոցատեր:ամառանոցատիր{mono}
բանջարանոցատեր:բանջարանոցատիր{mono}
հյուրանոցատեր:հյուրանոցատիր{mono}
ընտանիքատեր:ընտանիքատիր{mono}
գույքատեր:գույքատիր{mono}
հանքատեր:հանքատիր{mono}
հարսանքատեր:հարսանքատիր{mono}
ապրանքատեր:ապրանքատիր{mono}
պարտքատեր:պարտքատիր{mono}
գրքատեր:գրքատիր{mono}
այգետեր:այգետիր{mono}
ընտանետեր:ընտանետիր{mono}
բաժնետեր:բաժնետիր{mono}
հասցետեր:հասցետիր{mono}
տանտեր:տանտիր{mono}
արենտեր:արենտիր{mono}
արյունտեր:արյունտիր{mono}
տանուտեր:տանուտիր{mono}
սիրուտեր:սիրուտիր{mono}

ողջումաքիր:ողջումաքր

LEXICON NounFamilyOBase
#Larger list in noun_lex_irreg
եղբայր:եղբայր
աղբեր:աղբեր
փեսաղբեր:փեսաղբեր

ապեր:ապեր
ախպեր:ախպեր
ողջումախպեր:ողջումախպեր
կաթնախպեր:կաթնախպեր

յոթն-եղբայր:յոթն-եղբայր
արքաեղբայր:արքաեղբայր
հինգեղբայր:հինգեղբայր
հոգեղբայր:հոգեղբայր
կաթնեղբայր:կաթնեղբայր
հարսնեղբայր:հարսնեղբայր
խաչեղբայր:խաչեղբայր
գրչեղբայր:գրչեղբայր
փեսեղբայր:փեսեղբայր
հորեղբայր:հորեղբայր
մորեղբայր:մորեղբայր

հայր:հայր
մայր:մայր
հեր:հեր
մեր:մեր
սանահեր:սանահեր{mono}
սանամեր:սանամեր{mono}
թխսամեր:թխսամեր{mono}
տատմեր:տատմեր{mono}

աբբահայր:աբբահայր{mono}
նախահայր:նախահայր{mono}
աստվածահայր:աստվածահայր{mono}
պատմահայր:պատմահայր{mono}
սանահայր:սանահայր{mono}
վանահայր:վանահայր{mono}
խոստովանահայր:խոստովանահայր{mono}
դյուցազնահայր:դյուցազնահայր{mono}
հարսնահայր:հարսնահայր{mono}
կնքահայր:կնքահայր{mono}
հոգեհայր:հոգեհայր{mono}
ընտանեհայր:ընտանեհայր{mono}
մայր:մայր{mono}
ձագամայր:ձագամայր{mono}
սգամայր:սգամայր{mono}
կռթամայր:կռթամայր{mono}
ձուլամայր:ձուլամայր{mono}
նախամայր:նախամայր{mono}
երեխամայր:երեխամայր{mono}
աստվածամայր:աստվածամայր{mono}
առյուծամայր:առյուծամայր{mono}
կոճակամայր:կոճակամայր{mono}
մանկամայր:մանկամայր{mono}
կողամայր:կողամայր{mono}
արքայամայր:արքայամայր{mono}
սանամայր:սանամայր{mono}
վանամայր:վանամայր{mono}
դյուցազնամայր:դյուցազնամայր{mono}
գառնամայր:գառնամայր{mono}
հարսնամայր:հարսնամայր{mono}
գետնամայր:գետնամայր{mono}
եղնջամայր:եղնջամայր{mono}
տառամայր:տառամայր{mono}
թխսամայր:թխսամայր{mono}
հերոսամայր:հերոսամայր{mono}
պարսամայր:պարսամայր{mono}
լուսամայր:լուսամայր{mono}
ծովամայր:ծովամայր{mono}
ճագարամայր:ճագարամայր{mono}
եղերամայր:եղերամայր{mono}
տիրամայր:տիրամայր{mono}
դիցամայր:դիցամայր{mono}
քաղաքամայր:քաղաքամայր{mono}
կնքամայր:կնքամայր{mono}
հոգեմայր:հոգեմայր{mono}
ծծմայր:ծծմայր{mono}
տատմայր:տատմայր{mono}

LEXICON NounFamilyOAblauted
եղբայր:եղբոր
աղբեր:աղբոր
փեսաղբեր:փեսաղբոր

ապեր:ապոր
ախպեր:ախպոր
ողջումախպեր:ողջումախպոր
կաթնախպեր:կաթնախպոր


յոթն-եղբայր:յոթն-եղբոր
արքաեղբայր:արքաեղբոր
հինգեղբայր:հինգեղբոր
հոգեղբայր:հոգեղբոր
կաթնեղբայր:կաթնեղբոր
հարսնեղբայր:հարսնեղբոր
խաչեղբայր:խաչեղբոր
գրչեղբայր:գրչեղբոր
փեսեղբայր:փեսեղբոր
հորեղբայր:հորեղբոր
մորեղբայր:մորեղբոր


հայր:հոր
մայր:մոր
հեր:հոր
մեր:մոր
սանահեր:սանահոր{mono}
սանամեր:սանամոր{mono}
թխսամեր:թխսամոր{mono}
տատմեր:տատմոր{mono}

աբբահայր:աբբահոր{mono}
նախահայր:նախահոր{mono}
աստվածահայր:աստվածահոր{mono}
պատմահայր:պատմահոր{mono}
սանահայր:սանահոր{mono}
վանահայր:վանահոր{mono}
խոստովանահայր:խոստովանահոր{mono}
դյուցազնահայր:դյուցազնահոր{mono}
հարսնահայր:հարսնահոր{mono}
կնքահայր:կնքահոր{mono}
հոգեհայր:հոգեհոր{mono}
ընտանեհայր:ընտանեհոր{mono}

ձագամայր:ձագամոր{mono}
սգամայր:սգամոր{mono}
կռթամայր:կռթամոր{mono}
ձուլամայր:ձուլամոր{mono}
նախամայր:նախամոր{mono}
երեխամայր:երեխամոր{mono}
աստվածամայր:աստվածամոր{mono}
առյուծամայր:առյուծամոր{mono}
կոճակամայր:կոճակամոր{mono}
մանկամայր:մանկամոր{mono}
կողամայր:կողամոր{mono}
արքայամայր:արքայամոր{mono}
սանամայր:սանամոր{mono}
վանամայր:վանամոր{mono}
դյուցազնամայր:դյուցազնամոր{mono}
գառնամայր:գառնամոր{mono}
հարսնամայր:հարսնամոր{mono}
գետնամայր:գետնամոր{mono}
եղնջամայր:եղնջամոր{mono}
տառամայր:տառամոր{mono}
թխսամայր:թխսամոր{mono}
հերոսամայր:հերոսամոր{mono}
պարսամայր:պարսամոր{mono}
լուսամայր:լուսամոր{mono}
ծովամայր:ծովամոր{mono}
ճագարամայր:ճագարամոր{mono}
եղերամայր:եղերամոր{mono}
տիրամայր:տիրամոր{mono}
դիցամայր:դիցամոր{mono}
քաղաքամայր:քաղաքամոր{mono}
կնքամայր:կնքամոր{mono}
հոգեմայր:հոգեմոր{mono}
ծծմայր:ծծմոր{mono}
տատմայր:տատմոր{mono}


LEXICON NounMonoWithNer
հարս:հարս
հավերժահարս:հավերժահարս{mono}
անտառահարս:անտառահարս{mono}
ծովահարս:ծովահարս{mono}
ջրահարս:ջրահարս{mono}



LEXICON NounOldAnFormGar
# գառ գառան գառնից գառներ
# բուռ բռան բռնից բռներ
հարս:հարս  # Dir/LR

բեռ:բեռ
ձիաբեռ:ձիաբեռ{mono}
սայլաբեռ:սայլաբեռ{mono}
շալակաբեռ:շալակաբեռ{mono}
էշաբեռ:էշաբեռ{mono}
իշաբեռ:իշաբեռ{mono}
ուսաբեռ:ուսաբեռ{mono}
նավաբեռ:նավաբեռ{mono}
ուղտաբեռ:ուղտաբեռ{mono}
ուղեբեռ:ուղեբեռ{mono}
ջորեբեռ:ջորեբեռ{mono}
լեռ:լեռ
նախալեռ:նախալեռ{mono}
սառցալեռ:սառցալեռ{mono}

դուռ:դուռ
նախադուռ:նախադուռ{mono}
վանդակադուռ:վանդակադուռ{mono}
միջնադուռ:միջնադուռ{mono}
ետնադուռ:ետնադուռ{mono}
հետնադուռ:հետնադուռ{mono}
ներքնադուռ:ներքնադուռ{mono}
պարսպադուռ:պարսպադուռ{mono}
գաղտադուռ:գաղտադուռ{mono}
շքադուռ:շքադուռ{mono}
հոգեդուռ:հոգեդուռ{mono}

ձուկ:ձուկ
սևաձուկ:սևաձուկ{mono}
արևաձուկ:արևաձուկ{mono}
ձիաձուկ:ձիաձուկ{mono}
չալաձուկ:չալաձուկ{mono}
գայլաձուկ:գայլաձուկ{mono}
ծխաձուկ:ծխաձուկ{mono}
տափակաձուկ:տափակաձուկ{mono}
կռնկաձուկ:կռնկաձուկ{mono}
օձաձուկ:օձաձուկ{mono}
շեղաձուկ:շեղաձուկ{mono}
շիղաձուկ:շիղաձուկ{mono}
ձողաձուկ:ձողաձուկ{mono}
երկանաձուկ:երկանաձուկ{mono}
վահանաձուկ:վահանաձուկ{mono}
շնաձուկ:շնաձուկ{mono}
ուռնաձուկ:ուռնաձուկ{mono}
թյունաձուկ:թյունաձուկ{mono}
վիշապաձուկ:վիշապաձուկ{mono}
գետաձուկ:գետաձուկ{mono}
խայտաձուկ:խայտաձուկ{mono}
բրաձուկ:բրաձուկ{mono}
թրաձուկ:թրաձուկ{mono}
մանրաձուկ:մանրաձուկ{mono}
սղոցաձուկ:սղոցաձուկ{mono}
տափաձուկ:տափաձուկ{mono}
շերեփաձուկ:շերեփաձուկ{mono}
թանաքաձուկ:թանաքաձուկ{mono}
սրնքաձուկ:սրնքաձուկ{mono}
ոսկեձուկ:ոսկեձուկ{mono}
ոզնեձուկ:ոզնեձուկ{mono}
արևձուկ:արևձուկ{mono}

մուկ:մուկ  #Taken
ցայգամուկ:ցայգամուկ{mono}
ավազամուկ:ավազամուկ{mono}
շիկամուկ:շիկամուկ{mono}
մշկամուկ:մշկամուկ{mono}
ցատկամուկ:ցատկամուկ{mono}
պարկամուկ:պարկամուկ{mono}
գերմանամուկ:գերմանամուկ{mono}
փարավոնամուկ:փարավոնամուկ{mono}
արջամուկ:արջամուկ{mono}
թափառամուկ:թափառամուկ{mono}
դաշտամուկ:դաշտամուկ{mono}
ճագարամուկ:ճագարամուկ{mono}
գիշերամուկ:գիշերամուկ{mono}
ջրամուկ:ջրամուկ{mono}
կուրամուկ:կուրամուկ{mono}
ջրմուկ:ջրմուկ{mono}
